North Carolina, session 2025, HB986.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding the following new subdivisions
to read:
"(50) Duty to prohibit required posting of lesson plans or objectives. – The State
Board shall adopt rules prohibiting local school administrative units from
adopting policies that require teachers to post lesson plans or lesson
objectives. The State Board shall also not adopt rules requiring posting of
lesson plans or lesson objectives.
(51) Duty to prohibit schools from requiring teachers to serve additional duties
during lunch. – The State Board shall adopt rules prohibiting local school
administrative units or schools within local school administrative units from
imposing any duties on teachers during the teacher's allotted lunch time."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Provide Compensation for Teachers who Lead Professional Development.
– If a teacher employed by a local board of education provides professional
development to other teachers in the local school administrative unit, then the
local board of education shall compensate the teacher for the time spent
leading the professional development."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*H986-v-1*